Maine, session 132, LD846.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §634, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 134, §2, is repealed and
the following enacted in its place:
4. Dam removal. A person seeking to remove an existing dam that is part of a
hydropower project must comply with the requirements of this subsection.
A. Prior to filing an application for a permit to remove the dam, the person must attend
a preapplication meeting with the department and must hold a public informational
meeting. The preapplication meeting and the public informational meeting must be
held in accordance with the department's rules on the processing of applications.
B. An applicant for a permit to remove an existing dam must propose removal of the
entire dam structure. The department shall deny an application proposing to remove
only a portion of an existing dam.
C. If any portion of the dam structure is located on land owned by a municipality or
other government entity, the applicant must demonstrate to the department’s
satisfaction that the municipality or entity has approved the removal of that portion of
the dam structure. If the applicant fails to demonstrate such approval, the department
shall deny the application.
D. If the removal of the dam is expected to result in the alteration of water levels in
the body of water from which the dam is removed, as determined by the department
based on information provided by the applicant or otherwise available to the
department, the department shall require as a permit condition that prior to dam
removal, the applicant identify all landowners expected to be affected by the alteration
of water levels and set aside sufficient funds for reimbursing those landowners for the
corresponding loss in property value following dam removal. Dam removal may not
commence until the department has determined that the amount of funds set aside and
plan for disbursement of those funds to affected landowners is sufficient.